Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 4. Creation and Organization of the Game and Fish Department

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d Fish and Game §§ 41, 44.

36A C.J.S. Fish § 37; 38 C.J.S. Game § 50.

§ 23-1-401.
Game and fish department; creation; control.

The Wyoming game and fish department is created.

The department is under the direction and supervision of the commission.

The department consists of the director who is the chief administrative officer and such divisions as the commission may create.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-12.

Stated

in

O'Brien v. State, 711 P.2d 1144,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 23-1-402.
Game and fish director; appointment; salary; term of office; qualification; duties and authority.

The governor shall appoint a competent person as the director of the department as provided in W.S.

9-2-2010

at a salary determined by the commission, not to exceed the sum set by law.

The director shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The director is the chief administrative head of the department with general supervision and control of all activities, functions, and employees of the department, under the direction and supervision of the commission. He shall devote his entire time to the performance and supervision of the duties conferred on him by the commission and by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-13; Laws 1991, ch 253, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duties as a member of wildlife/livestock disease research partnership, see §

11-19-602

.

§ 23-1-403.
Chief fiscal officer.

The commission shall appoint a chief fiscal officer of the commission in the manner provided by law. The chief fiscal officer shall act as secretary of the commission and perform such other duties as may be directed by the director. He is removable as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-14.

§ 23-1-404.
Chief game and fish wardens; division chiefs.

The director, with the consent of the commission, shall appoint a chief game warden, a chief fish warden, and any necessary division chiefs as provided by law.

The chief game warden, chief fish warden, and division chiefs shall be men of knowledge and experience in the fields administered by their respective divisions, shall be the administrative head of their respective divisions, shall have administrative supervision of all activities and personnel of their respective divisions subject to the approval of the director, and shall devote their entire time to the service of the state in discharge of their official duties as provided by law and as prescribed by the commission. They are removable as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-15.

§ 23-1-405.
Game wardens; appointment based on competitive examination; investigation; removal.

All appointments of game wardens shall be based on competitive examinations. Applicants shall be knowledgeable of wildlife, and of the duties and responsibilities of game wardens. The commission shall provide for the investigation of the qualifications of each applicant. Examinations shall be held at selected points throughout Wyoming. Game wardens are removable as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-16.

§ 23-1-406.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 36, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 24, related to prohibition of political activity.